Tennessee, session 114, SB2473.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 42-4-106(d)(1), is amended by
deleting the following language:
The president shall prepare annually the operating budget of the authority and
submit the budget to the board for approval at least sixty (60) days prior to the beginning
of the fiscal year.
and substituting instead the following:
The president shall prepare annually the operating budget of the authority and
submit the budget to the board for approval at least seventy-five (75) days prior to the
beginning of the fiscal year.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2473
012510
- 1 -